Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1491
Principal, lobbyist, or person acting on behalf of either; false or misleading statements to public officials; prohibited.

A principal, lobbyist, or anyone acting on behalf of either, shall not knowingly or willfully make any false or misleading statement or misrepresentation of fact to any public official in the executive or legislative branch of state government.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 91;

Laws 1979, LB 162, § 7.